Hawaii statutes.
[§15D-17]
Equitable relief. A court may issue an injunction or
grant other equitable relief appropriate to ensure substantial compliance with
or enforce this chapter on application by:

(1) A covered voter alleging a grievance under this
chapter; or

(2) The attorney general of the State.

No award of attorney fees or costs shall be
permitted in any private cause of action initiated under this chapter. [L 2012,
c 226, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next